California, session 20252026, SB461.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11011.32 is added to the Government Code, to read:11011.32. (a) Notwithstanding Section 11011.1, the Director of General Services may sell, exchange, or lease to the City of Imperial, upon those terms and conditions the director determines are in the best interest of the state, all or any part of the following real property: The California Highway Patrol El Centro Area office located at 2331 U.S. Highway 86, Imperial, in the County of Imperial (APN 064-443-010).(b) To the extent bonds issued by the State Public Works Board involve the property to be sold or leased pursuant to this section, all issuer-related and trustee-related costs associated with the review of any proposed sale or lease, together with the costs related to the defeasance or retirement of any bonds, which may include the cost of nationally recognized bond counsel, shall be paid from the proceeds of any sale or lease authorized by this section.(c) Any sale or lease of the property to the City of Imperial pursuant to this section is exempt from Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(d) Net proceeds of the sale or lease shall be deposited pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11011.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances in the City of Imperial due to the city not currently having a police department building, the use of the existing building and property being consistent with its new intended use, and the state’s commitment to maintaining the property’s law enforcement purpose.